Nevada, session 83, AB119.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 412 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Attorney General may investigate any alleged
paramilitary activity. In conducting any such investigation, the
Attorney General shall not demand, collect or maintain
information about the political, religious or social views,
associations or activities of any person or group of persons unless:
(a) The information directly relates to an investigation into
paramilitary activity; and
(b) There are reasonable grounds to suspect that the subject of
the information is involved in paramilitary activity.
2. If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe
that a person has information or is in possession, custody or
control of any document or other tangible evidence relevant to an
investigation authorized by subsection 1, the Attorney General
may issue in writing and cause to be served upon that person an
investigative demand to:
(a) Appear and be examined under oath;
(b) Answer written interrogatories under oath; or
(c) Produce the document or other tangible evidence for
inspection and copying.
3. Any information provided in response to an investigative
demand issued pursuant to subsection 2, including, without
limitation, any document, record, material, testimony or answer,
must not be used in any criminal prosecution.
4. If the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe
that a person or group of persons has engaged in or is about to
engage in paramilitary activity, the Attorney General may file an
action for injunctive relief in the appropriate district court to
prevent the occurrence or continuance of paramilitary activity. An
injunction issued pursuant to this subsection does not preclude or
affect the availability of any other remedy, including, without
limitation, the filing or maintenance of a civil action for damages
pursuant to subsection 5.
5. A person who has suffered injury as a result of
paramilitary activity may bring a civil action against a person or
group of persons who has engaged in paramilitary activity. A
plaintiff who prevails in an action brought pursuant to this
-
*AB119_R1*

– 3 –
subsection may recover actual damages, compensatory damages,
attorney’s fees and costs and any other appropriate relief.
6. For the purposes of this section, a person or group of
persons shall be deemed to engage in paramilitary activity if the
person or group of persons knowingly, while acting as part of a
private paramilitary organization or in furtherance of any
objective of a private paramilitary organization:
(a) While armed with a deadly weapon, publicly patrols or
drills; or
(b) While armed with a dangerous weapon or deadly weapon:
(1) Publicly engages in conduct capable of causing physical
injury or death;
(2) Substantially interferes with the operations of a
governmental entity;
(3) Unlawfully assumes, exercises or asserts a function,
power or duty of a peace officer, state or local governmental
official or federal official;
(4) Interferes with or impairs or attempts to interfere with
or impair the legal rights of another person or group of persons
by:
(I) Preventing or attempting to prevent the other person
or group of persons from engaging in conduct in which the other
person or group of persons has a legal right to engage; or
(II) Causing or attempting to cause the other person or
group of persons to engage in conduct from which the other
person or group of persons has a legal right to abstain; or
(5) Trains to engage in an activity described in this
subsection.
7. This section does not apply to:
(a) The Armed Forces of the United States, the Nevada
National Guard or any regularly organized state militia or
unorganized or reserve militia called into service by a state or the
United States, including, without limitation, a defense force
authorized under 32 U.S.C. § 109(c);
(b) A group of persons that:
(1) Associates as a military organization solely for
historical purposes or fictional performances or parades in public
as part of a bona fide veterans’ organization; and
(2) Does not carry or use ammunition or explosives;
(c) Students in educational institutions where military science
is a part of the course of instruction when under the supervision of
a military instructor;
(d) Members of an organization authorized under state or
federal law to provide security services when performing the
functions authorized by law;
-
*AB119_R1*

– 4 –
(e) Members of an organization authorized under state or
federal law to provide training in paramilitary operations or law
enforcement when:
(1) Performing the functions authorized by law; and
(2) Under the direction and control of a governmental
authority; or
(f) Any lawful activity of the Department of Wildlife.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Armed forces” has the meaning ascribed to it in 10 U.S.C.
§ 101(a)(4).
(b) “Dangerous weapon” means any weapon, device,
instrument, material or substance which, under the circumstances
in which it is used, attempted to be used or threatened to be used,
is readily capable of causing substantial bodily harm or death.
(c) “Deadly weapon” means any instrument which, if used in
the ordinary manner contemplated by its design and construction,
will or is likely to cause substantial bodily harm or death.
(d) “Governmental entity” means an institution, board,
commission, bureau, council, department, division, authority or
other unit of government of this State, including, without
limitation, an agency or political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Peace officer” means any person upon whom some or all
of the powers of a peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS
289.150 to 289.360, inclusive.
(f) “Private paramilitary organization” means an organized
body consisting of three or more persons who associate under a
structure of command for the purpose of functioning or training
to function in a public place as a unit of combat, combat support,
law enforcement or security services.
H
-
*AB119_R1*